Washington statutes.
RCW 18.74.150

Unlawful activities—Persons exempt from licensure under chapter.

(1) It is unlawful for any person to practice or in any manner hold himself or herself out to practice physical therapy or designate himself or herself as a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant, unless he or she is licensed in accordance with this chapter or has unencumbered compact privilege as defined in RCW 18.74.500.

(2) This chapter does not restrict persons licensed under any other law of this state from engaging in the profession or practice for which they are licensed, if they are not representing themselves to be physical therapists, physical therapist assistants, or providers of physical therapy.

(3) The following persons are exempt from licensure as physical therapists under this chapter when engaged in the following activities:

(a) A person who is pursuing a course of study leading to a degree as a physical therapist in an approved professional education program and is satisfying supervised clinical education requirements related to his or her physical therapy education while under direct supervision of a licensed physical therapist;

(b) A physical therapist while practicing in the United States armed services, United States public health service, or veterans administration as based on requirements under federal regulations for state licensure of health care providers; and

(c) A physical therapist licensed in another United States jurisdiction, or a foreign-educated physical therapist credentialed in another country, performing physical therapy as part of teaching or participating in an educational seminar of no more than sixty days in a calendar year.

(4) The following persons are exempt from licensure as physical therapist assistants under this chapter when engaged in the following activities:

(a) A person who is pursuing a course of study leading to a degree as a physical therapist assistant in an approved professional education program and is satisfying supervised clinical education requirements related to his or her physical therapist assistant education while under direct supervision of a licensed physical therapist or licensed physical therapist assistant;

(b) A physical therapist assistant while practicing in the United States armed services, United States public health service, or veterans administration as based on requirements under federal regulations for state licensure of health care providers; and

(c) A physical therapist assistant licensed in another United States jurisdiction, or a foreign-educated physical therapist assistant credentialed in another country, or a physical therapist assistant who is teaching or participating in an educational seminar of no more than sixty days in a calendar year.

[ 2017 c 108 s 6; 2013 c 280 s 1; 2007 c 98 s 13; 2005 c 501 s 4.]